pt-PT: Tipo de cabeça de esfregona: Almofada descartável; Pó; Lisa; Pano de microfibra; Esfregona; Giratória; Esponja; Esponja a vapor; Cordão/fio; Tira; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta glave mopa: Blazinica za enkratno uporabo; Prah; Ploščata; Blazinica iz mikrovlaken; Čistilec; Vrtenje; Goba; Parna blazinica; Vrvica/preja; Trak; Druga
es: Tipo de cabezal de la fregona: Toallita desechable; Polvo; Plano; Almohadilla de microfibra; Depurador; Girar; Esponja; Almohadilla de vapor; Cadena/hilo; Banda; Otros
ja: モップヘッドのタイプ: 使い捨てパッド; ダスト; フラット; マイクロファイバーパッド; スクラバー; スピン; スポンジ; スチームパッド; ストリング/糸; ストリップ; その他
fr: Type de tête de la serpillière: Tampon jetable; Poussière; Plat; Tampon en microfibre; Brosse récurante; Rotative; Éponge; Tampon vapeur; Franges/fibres; Bande; Autre
pl: Typ głowicy mopa: Pad jednorazowy; Do kurzu; Płaskie; Nakładka z mikrofibry; Szorująca; Obrotowa; Gąbka; Nakładka parowa; Sznurkowa; Paskowy; Pozostałe
nl: Type dweilkop: Wegwerppad; Stof; Vlak; Microvezelpad; Schrobber; Roterend; Spons; Stoompad; Dradenmop; Strip; Overig
bg-BG: Тип глава за моп: Подложка за еднократна употреба; Прах; Плоска форма; Микрофибърна подложка; За търкане; Въртене; Гъба; Парна подложка; На ленти/прежда; Лента; Друго
tr: Paspas başlığı tipi: Tek kullanımlık ped; Toz; Düz; Mikrofiber ped; Ovucu başlık; Döner; Sünger; Buhar pedi; İpli / saçaklı; Şerit; Diğer
hu: Felmosófej típusa: Eldobható párna; Por; Lapos; Mikroszálas párna; Súroló; Forgás; Szivacs; Gőzpárna; Zsinór/fonal; Szalag; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ hlavice mopu: Jednorazová podložka; Prach; Plochá; Utierka z mikrovlákna; Drsná špongia; Otočná; Špongia; Parná podložka; Špagáty/priadza; Strip; Iné
ko: 걸레 헤드 유형: 일회용 패드; 먼지; 플랫; 마이크로파이버 패드; 연마형; 회전형; 스펀지; 스팀 패드; 실/원사; 조각; 기타
sv: Mopphuvudtyp: Engångsdyna; Damm; Platt; Mikrofiberdyna; Skrubber; Snurra; Svamp; Ångdyna; sträng/garn; Remsa; Övrigt
fi: Mopin pään tyyppi: Irrotettava pesutyyny; Pöly; Litteä; Mikrokuitutyyny; Pesuri; Kierrettävä; Sieni; Höyrytyyny; Naru/lanka; Liuska; Muu
zh-CN: 拖把头类型: 一次性拖布; 除尘拖布; 平板; 超细纤维; 洗刷头; 旋转头; 海绵; 蒸汽垫; 线绳头; 条状拖布; 其他
ru: Тип насадки для швабры: Одноразовая салфетка; Для сухой уборки; Плоская; Накладка из микрофибры; Насадка-скребок; Вращающаяся насадка; Губчатая; Паровая насадка; Веревка/пряжа; Ленточная; Другая
lt-LT: Šluotos galvutės tipas: Vienkartinis įklotas; Migla; Plokščias; Mikropluošto pagalvėlė; Šveitiklis; Sukimas; Kempinė; Garų pagalvėlė; Virvinė / siūlinė; Juosta; Kita
pt-BR: Tipo de cabeça do esfregão: Almofada descartável; Pó; Plano; Almofada de microfibra; Esfregador; Girar; Esponja; Almofada a vapor; Cordão/fio; Faixa; Outro
el: Τύπος κεφαλής σφουγγαρίστρας: Αναλώσιμο πανί; Ξεσκονίσματος; Επίπεδη; Μαξιλάρι μικροϊνών; Σφουγγαρίστρα; Γνέθω; Σφουγγάρι; Ατμοκαθαριστήρας; Σειρά/νήμα; Λωρίδων; Άλλο
cs: Typ hlavice k mopu: Jednorázový návlek; Na prach; Ploché; Návlek z mikrovlákna; Na drhnutí; Rotační; Houba; Na parní mop; Provázkový; Třásně; Jiné
da: Moppehovedtype: Engangsmåtte; Støv; Flad; Mikrofibermåtte; Skrubber; Spin; Svamp; Dampmåtte; Streng/garn; Strip; Andet
ro-RO: Tipul capului de mop: Cu disc de unică folosință; Pulbere; Plat; Burete din microfibră; Perie; Rotire; Burete; Placă cu abur; Sfoară/fir; Bandă; Altele
th: ประเภทหัวไม้ถูพื้น: แพ็ดใช้แล้วทิ้ง; ฝุ่น; เรียบ; แผ่นไมโครไฟเบอร์; แบบแปรงขัด; แบบหมุน; ฟองน้ำ; แผ่นถูไอน้ำ; แบบเส้นด้าย; แถบ; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 拖把頭類型: 免洗墊片; 除塵; 平坦式; 超細纖維墊; 刷毛頭; 旋轉; 海綿式; 蒸氣片; 線狀; 條狀; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta glave brisača: Jednokratni jastučić; Prah; Ravna; Jastučić od mikrovlakana; Četka za ribanje; Rotirajuće; Spužva; Parni jastučić; Konac/pređa; Traka; Ostalo
en: Mop head type: Disposable pad; Dust; Flat; Microfiber pad; Scrubber; Spin; Sponge; Steam pad; String/yarn; Strip; Other
nb: Moppehodetype: Engangspute; Støv; Flat; Mikrofiberpute; Skrubber; Spinne; Svamp; Damppute; Styrke/garn; Stripe; Annet
it: Tipo di testa del mocio: assorbente monouso; Polvere; Piatto; Tampone in microfibra; Scrubber; Rotazione; Spugna; Tappetino a vapore; stringa/yarn; Nastro; Altro
de: Typ des Wischmoppkopfes: Einweg-Pad; Puder; Flach; Mikrofaserpad; Schrubber; Spin-Mop; Schwamm; Dampfmop; Fransen; Streifen; Sonstiges
vi: Loại đầu cây lau nhà: Túi dùng một lần; Lau bụi; Phẳng; Miếng lau sợi microfiber; Miếng chà rửa; Xoay; Miếng bọt; Miếng lau hơi nước; Sợi/len; Dải; Khác